Tennessee, session 114, SB0165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-26-107(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting instead:
(c) It is the intent of the state to assist financially with the delivery of human
resources for residents. After the creation of any such board as provided in this chapter
and when the local governments have indicated a willingness to contribute financially by
adopting a budget requiring a certain per capita assessment, the state is authorized to
match the local contributions according to the following schedule:
Local Assessment Annual State
Cents/Capita Contribution
1-20 $295,000
21-30 $340,000
31 and over $370,000
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0165
000749
- 1 -